Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 5.1. Virginia Fair Housing Law.

§ 36-96.1.
Declaration of policy.

This chapter shall be known and referred to as the Virginia Fair Housing Law.

It is the policy of the Commonwealth of Virginia to provide for fair housing throughout the Commonwealth, to all its citizens, regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, source of funds, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability, and to that end to prohibit discriminatory practices with respect to residential housing by any person or group of persons, in order that the peace, health, safety, prosperity, and general welfare of all the inhabitants of the Commonwealth may be protected and ensured. This law shall be deemed an exercise of the police power of the Commonwealth of Virginia for the protection of the people of the Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 591, §§

36-86

, 36-87; 1973, c. 358; 1978, c. 138; 1989, c. 88; 1991, c. 557; 2020, cc. 477, 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477, 478.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 477, in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “source of funds,” and substituted “ensured” for “insured”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1140, in B, substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, or disability,” for “or handicap.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” in subsection B.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-222 Assurances by Landlord Including Accessibility by Handicapped Persons; No. 16-532 Additional Clauses for Insertion in Declaration of Covenants and Restrictions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3B M.J. Civil Rights, § 7; 9B M.J. Housing, § 1.

§ 36-96.1:1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Aggrieved person” means any person who (i) claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice or (ii) believes that such person will be injured by a discriminatory housing practice that is about to occur.

“Assistance animal”
means an animal that works, provides assistance, or performs tasks for the benefit of a person with a disability, or provides emotional support that alleviates one or more identified symptoms or effects of a person’s disability. Assistance animals perform many disability-related functions, including guiding individuals who are blind or have low vision, alerting individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing to sounds, providing protection or rescue assistance, pulling a wheelchair, fetching items, alerting persons to impending seizures, or providing emotional support to persons with disabilities who have a disability-related need for such support. An assistance animal is not required to be individually trained or certified. While dogs are the most common type of assistance animal, other animals can also be assistance animals. An assistance animal is not a pet.

“Complainant”
means a person, including the Fair Housing Board, who files a complaint under §

36-96.9

.

“Conciliation”
means the attempted resolution of issues raised by a complainant, or by the investigation of such complaint, through informal negotiations involving the aggrieved person, the respondent, their respective authorized representatives and the Fair Housing Board.

“Conciliation agreement” means a written agreement setting forth the resolution of the issues in conciliation.

“Disability”
means, with respect to a person, (i) a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of such person’s major life activities; (ii) a record of having such an impairment; or (iii) being regarded as having such an impairment. The term does not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlled substance as defined in Virginia or federal law. For the purposes of this chapter, the terms “disability” and “handicap” shall be interchangeable.

“Discriminatory housing practices”
means an act that is unlawful under §

36-96.3

,

36-96.4

,

36-96.5

, or

36-96.6

.

“Dwelling”
means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is occupied as, or designated or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion thereof.

“Elderliness”
means an individual who has attained his fifty-fifth birthday.

“Familial status” means one or more individuals who have not attained the age of 18 years being domiciled with (i) a parent or other person having legal custody of such individual or individuals or (ii) the designee of such parent or other person having custody with the written permission of such parent or other person. The term “familial status” also includes any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of 18 years. For purposes of this section, “in the process of securing legal custody” means having filed an appropriate petition to obtain legal custody of such minor in a court of competent jurisdiction.

“Family”
includes a single individual, whether male or female.

“Lending institution”
includes any bank, savings institution, credit union, insurance company or mortgage lender.

“Major life activities”
includes any the following functions: caring for oneself, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning, and working.

“Military status”
means status as (i) a member of the uniformed forces, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(a)(5), of the United States or a reserve component thereof named under 10 U.S.C. § 10101, (ii) a veteran as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2), or (iii) a dependent as defined in 50 U.S.C. § 3911(4) except that the support provided by the service member to the individual shall have been provided 180 days immediately preceding an alleged action that if proven true would constitute unlawful discrimination under this section instead of 180 days immediately preceding an application for relief under 50 U.S.C. Chapter 50.

“Person”
means one or more individuals, whether male or female, corporations, partnerships, associations, labor organizations, fair housing organizations, civil rights organizations, organizations, governmental entities, legal representatives, mutual companies, joint stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers and fiduciaries.

“Physical or mental impairment” includes any of the following: (i) any physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the following body systems: neurological; musculoskeletal; special sense organs; respiratory, including speech organs; cardiovascular; reproductive; digestive; genito-urinary; hemic and lymphatic; skin; or endocrine or (ii) any mental or psychological disorder, such as an intellectual or developmental disability, organic brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, or specific learning disability. “Physical or mental impairment” includes such diseases and conditions as orthopedic, visual, speech, and hearing impairments; cerebral palsy; autism; epilepsy; muscular dystrophy; multiple sclerosis; cancer; heart disease; diabetes; human immunodeficiency virus infection; intellectual and developmental disabilities; emotional illness; drug addiction other than addiction caused by current, illegal use of a controlled substance; and alcoholism.

“Religion”
includes any outward expression of religious faith, including adherence to religious dressing and grooming practices and the carrying or display of religious items or symbols.

“Respondent” means any person or other entity alleged to have violated the provisions of this chapter, as stated in a complaint filed under the provisions of this chapter and any other person joined pursuant to the provisions of §

36-96.9

.

“Restrictive covenant”
means any specification in any instrument affecting title to real property that purports to limit the use, occupancy, transfer, rental, or lease of any dwelling because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability.

“Source of funds”
means any source that lawfully provides funds to or on behalf of a renter or buyer of housing, including any assistance, benefit, or subsidy program, whether such program is administered by a governmental or nongovernmental entity.

“To rent”
means to lease, to sublease, to let, or otherwise to grant for consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-87; 1973, c. 358; 1978, c. 138; 1989, c. 88; 1991, c. 557; 1992, c. 322; 1996, c. 77; 2003, c. 575; 2017, cc. 575, 729; 2020, cc. 477, 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477, 478; 2022, c. 799.

Cross references.

As to provisions relating to the Fair Housing Board generally, see §

54.1-2343

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 575, cls. 2 through 5 provide: “2. That the Fair Housing Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the certification provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.

“3. That all rules and regulations adopted by the Real Estate Board that are in effect as of the effective date of this act and that pertain to the subject of this act shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended or rescinded by the Fair Housing Board.

“4. That, to affect the purposes of this act, the Real Estate Board and the Fair Housing Board may (i) share staff and other resources, (ii) coordinate educational requirements for their respective regulants, (iii) coordinate the adoption of their respective regulations, and (iv) otherwise provide for the consistent application of the Virginia Fair Housing Law (§

36-96.1

et seq.).

“5. That the Real Estate Board shall provide funding for the operation of the Fair Housing Board until such time as the Fair Housing Board is funded through the implementation of the certification and registration requirements authorized by the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2017, cc. 575 and 729, cl. 2 provides: “That if any provision of this act is determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development to be not substantially equivalent or otherwise inconsistent with the federal Fair Housing Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq., as amended, such provision shall not be enforceable.”

That if any provision of this act is determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development to be not substantially equivalent or otherwise inconsistent with the federal Fair Housing Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq., as amended, such provision shall not be enforceable.

The 1996 amendment

deleted “and loan” following “savings” in the paragraph defining “Lending institution.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 575 substituted “Fair Housing Board” for “Real Estate Board” in the definitions of ‘complainant’ and ‘conciliation;’ twice substituted “that” for “which” in the definition of ‘dwelling;’ twice substituted “18” for “eighteen” in the definition of ‘familial status;’ substituted “that” for “which” in clause (i) of the definition of ‘handicap,’ and in the definition of ‘restrictive covenant.’

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 575 and 729 are identical, and added the definitions of “Assistance animal,” “Major life activities,” and “Physical or mental impairment”; in the definition of “Handicap,” rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read “Neither the term ‘individual with a handicap’ nor the term ‘handicap’ shall apply to an individual solely because that individual is a transvestite”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 477 added the definition for “Source of funds.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the definition for “Restrictive covenant.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 1140, added the definition for “Disability”; deleted the definition for “Handicap”; substituted “includes” for “means, but shall not be limited to” in the definitions for “Major life activities” and “Physical or mental impairment”; and substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, or disability” for “or handicap” in the definition for “Restrictive covenant.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “requires a different meaning” for “clearly indicates otherwise” in the introductory paragraph; inserted the definition for “Military status”; and substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” in the definition for “Restrictive covenant.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 799 added the definition of “Religion.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-101 Residential Lease Agreement, Etc.; No. 16-126. Simple Month-to-Month Lease; No. 16-221 Accessibility by Handicapped Persons; No. 16-295 Pets; No. 16-301 Application for Tenancy; No. 16-320 Checklist for Drafting Residential Lease.

§ 36-96.2.
Exemptions.

Except as provided in subdivision A 3 of §

36-96.3

and subsections A, B, and C of §

36-96.6

, this chapter shall not apply to any single-family house sold or rented by an owner, provided that such private individual does not own more than three single-family houses at any one time. In the case of the sale of any single-family house by a private individual-owner not residing in the house at the time of the sale or who was not the most recent resident of the house prior to sale, the exemption granted shall apply only with respect to one such sale within any 24-month period, provided that such bona fide private individual owner does not own any interest in, nor is there owned or reserved on his behalf, under any express or voluntary agreement, title to or any right to all or a portion of the proceeds from the sale or rental of, more than three such single-family houses at any one time. The sale or rental of any such single-family house shall be exempt from the application of this chapter only if the house is sold or rented (i) without the use in any manner of the sales or rental facilities or the sales or rental services of any real estate broker, agent, salesperson, or of the facilities or the services of any person in the business of selling or renting dwellings, or of any employee, independent contractor, or agent of any broker, agent, salesperson, or person and (ii) without the publication, posting, or mailing, after notice, of any advertisement or written notice in violation of this chapter. However, nothing herein shall prohibit the use of attorneys, escrow agents, abstractors, title companies, and other professional assistance as necessary to perfect or transfer the title. This exemption shall not apply to or inure to the benefit of any licensee of the Real Estate Board or regulant of the Fair Housing Board, regardless of whether the licensee is acting in his personal or professional capacity.

Except for subdivision A 3 of §

36-96.3

, this chapter shall not apply to rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other, if the owner actually maintains and occupies one of such living quarters as his residence.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a religious organization, association or society, or any nonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled by or in conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society, from limiting the sale, rental, or occupancy of dwellings that it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of the same religion, or from giving preferences to such persons, unless membership in such religion is restricted on account of race, color, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability. Nor shall anything in this chapter apply to a private membership club not in fact open to the public, which as an incident to its primary purpose or purposes provides lodging that it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose, from limiting the rental or occupancy of such lodgings to its members or from giving preference to its members. Nor, where matters of personal privacy are involved, shall anything in this chapter be construed to prohibit any private, state-owned, or state-supported educational institution, hospital, nursing home, or religious or correctional institution from requiring that persons of both sexes not occupy any single-family residence or room or unit of dwellings or other buildings, or restrooms in such room or unit in dwellings or other buildings, which it owns or operates.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits conduct against a person because such person has been convicted by any court of competent jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance as defined in federal law.

It shall not be unlawful under this chapter for any owner to deny or limit the rental of housing to persons who pose a clear and present threat of substantial harm to others or to the dwelling itself.

A rental application may require disclosure by the applicant of any criminal convictions and the owner or managing agent may require as a condition of acceptance of the rental application that applicant consent in writing to a criminal record check to verify the disclosures made by applicant in the rental application. The owner or managing agent may collect from the applicant moneys to reimburse the owner or managing agent for the exact amount of the out-of-pocket costs for such criminal record checks. Nothing in this chapter shall require an owner or managing agent to rent a dwelling to an individual who, based on a prior record of criminal convictions involving harm to persons or property, would constitute a clear and present threat to the health or safety of other individuals.

Nothing in this chapter limits the applicability of any reasonable local, state or federal restriction regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling. Owners or managing agents of dwellings may develop and implement reasonable occupancy and safety standards based on factors such as the number and size of sleeping areas or bedrooms and overall size of a dwelling unit so long as the standards do not violate local, state or federal restrictions. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the rental application or similar document from requiring information concerning the number, ages, sex and familial relationship of the applicants and the dwelling’s intended occupants.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a landlord from considering evidence of an applicant’s status as a victim of family abuse, as defined in § 16.1-228, to mitigate any adverse effect of an otherwise qualified applicant’s application pursuant to subsection D of §

55.1-1203

.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an owner or an owner’s managing agent from denying or limiting the rental or occupancy of a rental dwelling unit to a person because of such person’s source of funds, provided that such owner does not own more than four rental dwelling units in the Commonwealth at the time of the alleged discriminatory housing practice. However, if an owner, whether individually or through a business entity, owns more than a 10 percent interest in more than four rental dwelling units in the Commonwealth at the time of the alleged discriminatory housing practice, the exemption provided in this subsection shall not apply.

It shall not be unlawful under this chapter for an owner or an owner’s managing agent to deny or limit a person’s rental or occupancy of a rental dwelling unit based on the person’s source of funds for that unit if such source is not approved within 15 days of the person’s submission of the request for tenancy approval.

History.

1972, c. 591, §§ 36-87, 36-92; 1973, c. 358; 1978, c. 138; 1989, c. 88; 1991, c. 557; 1992, c. 322; 2003, c. 575; 2006, c. 693; 2020, cc. 388, 477, 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477, 478.

Cross references.

As to regulations implementing Acts 2003, c. 575, coordination between Real Estate Board and Fair Housing Board, and funding, see Editor’s note under §

36-96.1:1

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 575 in subsection A, substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in the second sentence, and inserted “or regulant of the Fair Housing Board” in the last sentence; and substituted “that” for “which” following “dwellings” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 693 inserted “and subsections A, B, and C of §

36-96.6

” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 388 added subsection H.

The 2020 amendment by c. 477 added subsections H and I which under the direction of the Virginia Code Commission were redesignated as subsections I and J.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, in subsection C, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the first sentence, and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1140, substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, or disability” for “or handicap” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” in the first sentence of subsection C.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Tenant not required to plead facts sufficient to defeat exemption. —

Tenant was not required to plead facts sufficient to defeat the exemptions to the Virginia Fair Housing Act and the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act, subsection A of §

36-96.2

and 42 U.S.C.S. § 3603(b)(1) because many victims of discrimination likely would not know or have any readily available way of determining whether a private individual landlord owned more than three single-family homes, but an individual defendant would immediately know whether he or she fell within the exemption to the state and federal acts and could easily assert such a defense at a comparatively small cost; it strains logic and reason that exemptions to a statute had to be affirmatively negated in a complaint. Hughes v. Bransfield, 84 Va. Cir. 214, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 11 (Fairfax County Jan. 11, 2012).

Plea in bar. —

When prospective tenants brought a cause of action against a real estate licensee for unlawful discrimination, the licensee’s plea in bar was not appropriate because there was no threat of substantial harm to the dwelling itself. Commonwealth ex rel. Real Estate Bd. v. Tutt Taylor & Rankin Real Estate, LLC, 102 Va. Cir. 125, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 104 (Loudoun County May 9, 2019).

§ 36-96.3.
Unlawful discriminatory housing practices.

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory housing practice for any person to:

Refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any person because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, source of funds, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or military status;

Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in the connection therewith to any person because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, source of funds, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or military status;

Make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination or an intention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, source of funds, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability. The use of words or symbols associated with a particular religion, national origin, sex, or race shall be prima facie evidence of an illegal preference under this chapter that shall not be overcome by a general disclaimer. However, reference alone to places of worship, including churches, synagogues, temples, or mosques, in any such notice, statement, or advertisement shall not be prima facie evidence of an illegal preference;

Represent to any person because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, source of funds, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability that any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is in fact so available;

Deny any person access to membership in or participation in any multiple listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings or discriminate against such person in the terms or conditions of such access, membership, or participation because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, source of funds, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability;

Include in any transfer, sale, rental, or lease of housing any restrictive covenant that discriminates because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, source of funds, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability or for any person to honor or exercise, or attempt to honor or exercise, any such discriminatory covenant pertaining to housing;

Induce or attempt to induce to sell or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, source of funds, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability;

Refuse to sell or rent, or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise discriminate or make unavailable or deny a dwelling because of a disability of (i) the buyer or renter; (ii) a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is so sold, rented, or made available; or (iii) any person associated with the buyer or renter; or

Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection therewith because of a disability of (i) that person; (ii) a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it was so sold, rented, or made available; or (iii) any person associated with that buyer or renter.

For the purposes of this section, discrimination includes (i) a refusal to permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by any person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the premises; except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter’s agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted; (ii) a refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, practices, policies, or services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford such person equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or (iii) in connection with the design and construction of covered multi-family dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct dwellings in such a manner that:

The public use and common use areas of the dwellings are readily accessible to and usable by disabled persons;

All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises are sufficiently wide to allow passage by disabled persons in wheelchairs; and

All premises within covered multi-family dwelling units contain an accessible route into and through the dwelling; light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmental controls are in accessible locations; there are reinforcements in the bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab bars; and there are usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchair can maneuver about the space. As used in this subdivision, the term “covered multi-family dwellings” means buildings consisting of four or more units if such buildings have one or more elevators and ground floor units in other buildings consisting of four or more units.

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory housing practice for any political jurisdiction or its employees or appointed commissions to discriminate in the application of local land use ordinances or guidelines, or in the permitting of housing developments, (i) on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, source of funds, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability; (ii) because the housing development contains or is expected to contain affordable housing units occupied or intended for occupancy by families or individuals with incomes at or below 80 percent of the median income of the area where the housing development is located or is proposed to be located; or (iii) by prohibiting or imposing conditions upon the rental or sale of dwelling units, provided that the provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit ordinances related to short-term rentals as defined in §

15.2-983

. It shall not be a violation of this chapter if land use decisions or decisions relating to the permitting of housing developments are based upon considerations of limiting high concentrations of affordable housing.

Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the American National Standards for Building and Facilities (commonly cited as “ANSI A117.1”) or with any other standards adopted as part of regulations promulgated by HUD providing accessibility and usability for physically disabled people shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of subdivision B 3.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to invalidate or limit any Virginia law or regulation that requires dwellings to be designed and constructed in a manner that affords disabled persons greater access than is required by this chapter.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-88; 1973, c. 358; 1978, c. 138; 1984, c. 685; 1985, c. 344; 1989, c. 88; 1991, c. 557; 1992, c. 322; 1996, c. 327; 2020, cc. 477, 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 267, 477, 478.

The 1996 amendment

added the third sentence in subdivision A 3.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 477 inserted “source of funds” in subsections A 1 through A 7; deleted “but not limited to” preceding “churches” in second sentence of subsection A 3; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” or similar language following “familial status” throughout the section; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1140, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran” and substituted “disability” for “handicap” and similar language throughout the section; deleted “but not limited to” following “including” in the last sentence of subdivision A 3; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 267, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection C and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” throughout the section.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia property law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (2000).

§ 36-96.3:1.
Rights and responsibilities with respect to the use of an assistance animal in a dwelling.

A person with a disability, or a person associated with such person, who maintains an assistance animal in a dwelling shall comply with the rental agreement or any rules and regulations of the property owner applicable to all residents that do not interfere with an equal opportunity to use and enjoy the dwelling and any common areas of the premises. Such person shall not be required to pay a pet fee or deposit or any additional rent to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling, but shall be responsible for any physical damages to the dwelling if residents who maintain pets are responsible for such damages in accordance with such documents or state law. Nothing herein shall be construed to affect any cause of action against any resident for other damages under the laws of the Commonwealth.

If a person’s disability is obvious or otherwise known to the person receiving a request, or if the need for a requested accommodation is readily apparent or known to the person receiving a request, the person receiving a request for reasonable accommodation may not request any additional verification about the requester’s disability. If a person’s disability is readily apparent or known to the person receiving the request but the disability-related need is not readily apparent or known, the person receiving the request may ask for additional verification to evaluate the requester’s disability-related need.

A person with a disability, or a person associated with such person, may submit a request for a reasonable accommodation to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling. Subject to subsection B, the person receiving the request may ask the requester to provide reliable documentation of the disability and the disability-related need for an assistance animal, including documentation from any person with whom the person with a disability has or has had a therapeutic relationship.

Subject to subsection B, a person receiving a request for a reasonable accommodation to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling shall evaluate the request and any reliable supporting documentation to verify the disability and the disability-related need for the reasonable accommodation regarding an assistance animal.

For purposes of this section, “therapeutic relationship” means the provision of medical care, program care, or personal care services, in good faith, to the person with a disability by (i) a mental health service provider as defined in §

54.1-2400.1

; (ii) an individual or entity with a valid, unrestricted state license, certification, or registration to serve persons with disabilities; (iii) a person from a peer support or similar group that does not charge service recipients a fee or impose any actual or implied financial requirement and who has actual knowledge about the requester’s disability; or (iv) a caregiver, reliable third party, or government entity with actual knowledge of the requester’s disability.

History.

2017, cc. 575, 729.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 575 and 729, cl. 2 provides: “That if any provision of this act is determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development to be not substantially equivalent or otherwise inconsistent with the federal Fair Housing Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq., as amended, such provision shall not be enforceable.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-101 Residential Lease Agreement, Etc.; No. 16-126 Simple Month-to-Month Lease; No. 16-221 Accessibility by Handicapped Persons; No. 16-295 Pets; No. 16-301 Application for Tenancy; No. 16-320 Checklist for Drafting Residential Lease.